test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbDertoNomen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Nomens derived form verbs. The verb to nomen derivations are the following: +Der/mus,
# +Der/NomAct, +Der/NomAg, +Der/lis, +Der/ahtes, +Der/r, +Der/ahkes. The derivation +Der/dahka
# is also in the root file, but it is outcommented in the lexicon file. 

Tests:

  Verb - iellet: # DeverbalNounsBASSAT (bassat, jiehket, juhkat, láhppet, máhttet)
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: iellem
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [iellemam, iellemim]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: [iellemat, iellemit]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: iellemihtte
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen: iellema
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: iellemiska
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: ielle
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Gen: ielle
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Acc: iellev
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ine: iellen
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ill: [ælláj, älláj]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ela: ielles
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Com: iellijn
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom: ielle
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Gen: iellij
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Acc: iellijt
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ine: iellijn
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ill: iellijda
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ela: iellijs
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Com: iellij
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Ess: iellen
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: iellemus
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: iellemussam
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: iellemussas
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: iellemussam
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: iellemussat
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: iellemussada
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: iellemussaj
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: iellemussasihtte
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: [ællális, ällális]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Ela: [ællálisás, ällálisás]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Attr: [ællális, ällális]
    iellet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: [ælán, älán] 
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ill: [ælánij, älánij] 

  Verb - juhkat: # Same as above, but juhkat has issues, thus tested separately
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: juhkam
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [juhkamim, juhkamam]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: [juhkamit, juhkamat]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: juhkamihtte
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen: juhkama
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: juhkamiska
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: juhkke
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Gen: juhkke
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Acc: juhkkev
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ine: juhkken
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkáj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ela: juhkkes
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Com: juhkkijn
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom: juhkke
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Gen: juhkkij
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Acc: juhkkijt
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ine: juhkkijn
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ill: juhkkijda
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ela: juhkkijs
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Com: juhkkij
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Ess: juhkken
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: jugán 
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ela: jugánis 

  Verb - vádtset: # DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT IV (ravggat, viedjet, bårssjot, buollet, boahtet, vilssjot)
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: vádtsemus
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: vádtsemussam
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vádtsemussas
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: vádtsemussada
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen: vádtsemusá
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: vádtsemusám
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: vádtsemusás
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vádtsemusáma
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: vádtsemusása
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Acc: vádtsemusáv
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ine: vádtsemusán
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: vádtsemussaj
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: vádtsemussasihtte
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ela: vádtsemusás
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Acc: vádtsemusájt
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ine: vádtsemusájn
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ill: vádtsemusájda
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Ess: vádtsemussan
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: vádtse
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Acc: vádtsijt
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: vádtsem
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill: vádtsemijda
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: vádtsális
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Ine: vádtsálisájn
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ela: váttsánis

  Verb - asstat: # DeverbalNounsASSTAT IV (asstat)
    asstat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: asstamus
    asstat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: asstamussaj
    asstat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: asstam
    asstat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen: asstamij
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: asstalis
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: asstalisájt 
    asstat+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ine: astanin

  Verb - duolmmot: # DeverbalNouns
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: duolmmomus
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: duolmmomussaj
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: duolmmom
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen: duolmmomij
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: duolmmulis
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: duolmmulisájt 
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    duolmmot+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ine: duolmunin

  Verb - jåksåt: # DeverbalNouns
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: jåksåmus
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: jåksåmussaj
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: jåksåm
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen: jåksåmij
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: jåksålis
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: jåksålisájt 
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    jåksåt+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Gen: jåvsåna

  Verb - avtastahttet: # DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET TV (bassalasstet)
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahttem
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahtte
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: avtastahttális
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahttemus
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - biebmadit: # DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET TV (ahtja)
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjam
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahttje
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjalis
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjamus
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []


  Verb - bårråt: # BASSALASSTEINCH TV (dalla, dahttem dasste, ladda, lahtta, kasste, stalla, stahtte, stasste)
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: bårådasstem
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill: bårådasstemij
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: bårådasste
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom: bårådasste
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: bårådasstális
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: bårådasstálisájt
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: bårådasstemus
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/mus+N+Pl+Com: bårådasstemusáj
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Ine: bårånin

  Verb - gallánaddat: # DeverbalNounsRAVGGALASSTET IV (ravggalasstet)
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: gallánaddam
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: gallánadde
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: gallánaddalis
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: gallánaddamus

  Verb - diehtet: # DeverbalNounsDIEHTET TV (diehtet)
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: diehtem
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen: diehtema
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: diehtemus
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Com: diehtemusájn
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - tjádjánit: # DeverbalNounsJÅLLÅRIT (báhtarit, lassánit, suognalit, baládit, jållårit
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tjádjánibme
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc: tjádjánimev
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com: tjádjánimij
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: tjádjánibmen
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tjádjániddje
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjádjánahkes
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Ill: tjádjánahkkáj
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Pl+Com: tjádjánahkkáj
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjádjánahtes
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Ela: [tjádjánahttás, tjádjánahttásis]

  Verb - lijkkut: # JÅLLÅRITINCH (d, l, st, u/a/åd)
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: lijkkustibme
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc: lijkkustimev
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com: lijkkustimij
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: lijkkustibmen
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: lijkkustiddje
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: lijkkustahkes
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: lijkkustahtes
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []


  Verb - tjáhkkidit: # DeverbalNounsUNNEDIT TV (vuorddelit, bånjådit, unnedit)
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidibme
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkididdje
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ela: tjáhkkididdjes
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ine: tjáhkkididdjijn
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidahkes
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidahtes

  Verb - mávsatjit: # DeverbalNounsMUJTATJIT TV (mujtatjit)
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: mávsatjibme
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com: mávsatjimijn
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom: mávsatjime
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: mávsatjiddje
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: mávsatjahkes 
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: mávsatjahtes

  Verb - måjådit: # DeverbalNounsBEGATJIT IV (begatjit)
    måjådit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: måjådibme
    måjådit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: måjådiddje
    måjådit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: måjådahkes 
    måjådit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomAct+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: måjådahtes

  Verb - åhttsåt: # DeverbalNounsOADDÁT IV (oaddát)
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåm
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill: åhttsåmij
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ela: åhttsåmijs
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåjiddje 
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåmus
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ela: åhttsåmusás
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ela: åhttsåmusájs
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - barggát: # DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT TV (tjuollát)
    barggát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: barggám
    barggát+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: barggájiddje 
    barggát+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: barggámus
    barggát+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    barggát+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - bårådit: # DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT TV (ahttját)
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjám
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjájiddje
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjámus
    bårådit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []
